popytka.twol
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Ӄ Л Ԓ М Н Ӈ О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к ӄ л ԓ м н ӈ о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ʼ

 %{T%}:т %{T%}:0
! %{т%}:т %{т%}:0
! %{E%}:э %{t%}:а
! %{N%}:ӈ %{N%}:г
 %{и%}:и %{и%}:э %{и%}:0

! %{к%}:к %{к%}:г
! %{e%}:э %{e%}:г
 %{ы%}:ы %{ы%}:0
 %{G%}:й %{G%}:э %{G%}:г

! %{ъ%}:ъ %{ъ%}:0

 %{·%}:0         ! Stem-final vowel deletion
 %{°%}:0         ! Stem-final vowel reduction
 %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}:0       ! Dominant vowel harmony

 %→:0            ! Incorporation boundary
 %>:0            ! Morpheme boundary
 %{☭%}:0         ! Trigger for loan word phonology
  ;

Sets

Vow   = А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я
        а е ё и о у ы э ю я ;

Yot = Е е Ё ё Ю ю Я я ;

Cns   = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Ӄ Л Ԓ М Н Ӈ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь ʼ
        б в г д ж з й к ӄ л ԓ м н ӈ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь ;

Dominant = А О Я Ё
           а о я ё ;

Coronal = Т Н Й Ч Р                 ! there was л before but this is from the grammar
          т н й ч р ;

Glottal = ʼ Ъ Ь ъ ь ;

! this is not actually a set that i'm going to use, just descriptive
! Archiphonemes = Æ ! this is the э that is recessive and may be turned to а
!                T ! latin; erg & com т of 0
!                G ! first in all & abl
!                ;

Rules


 "Vowel harmony"
! а й в а л >:0 у:о
Vx:Vy <=> [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] :* _ ;
                                     _ :* [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] ;
        except
            .#. _ %>: :Vow ;
            Cns _ %>: :Vow ;
                _ :* \ %>: %{☭%}: ;
        where
            Vx in ( у ю и %{Æ%} ы )
            Vy in ( о ё э   а   я ) matched ;


"Vowel harmony for Æ (recessive)"
! Æ:э ю:ю п ы ч ь >:0 у:у
%{Æ%}:э <=>  _ ;
      except
        [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] :* _ ;
                                   _ :* [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] ;
                               .#. _ %>: :Vow ;
                               Cns _ %>: :Vow ;


"Vowel deletion"                    ! because syllable structure
! Æ:0 >:0 а г н о т в а н в >:0 {ы}:ы к Æ:а
V:0 <=> .#. _ %>: :Vow ;
        Cns _ %>: :Vow ;
        where
            V in ( а %{Æ%} ) ;


"Epenthesis"                        ! check if works for word-final
! а й в а >:0 {ы}:0 к
%{ы%}:ы <=> Cns Cns ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ Cns ;
                Cns ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ Cns Cns ;
            Cns ( %{☭%}: ) ( %>: ) _ Cns .#. ;
     Vow Cns ( %{☭%}: ) %>: %{G%}: _ ;


"t insertion after vowel-final stems"
! г Æ:0 >:0 а й в а >:0 {T}:т Æ:а
! г Æ:0 >:0 а г т а ч г >:0 {T}:0 Æ:а
%{T%}:т <=> Vow ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ ;



"All/Abl allomorph г-"
! а й в а >:0 {G}:г т ы {⁺ⱽᴴ}:0
%{G%}:г <=> Vow Cns ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ ;
                    ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ т ;
        except
                Cns ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ т ;


"All/Abl allomorph э-"
%{G%}:э <=> Cns Cns ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ ;
                Cns ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ т ;


"Abl allomorph й-"
%{G%}:й <=> Vow ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ ;
        except
                ( %{☭%}: ) %>: _ т ;               ! this line turns off Allative


"{и} after non-coronals"
%{и%}:0 <=> [ :Cns - :Coronal ] ( %{☭%}: ) %>: %{ы%}: т _ ;
